Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.290

Access to agencies—Records inspection.

All agencies subject to this chapter shall accord the department, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and the director of fire protection, or their designees, the right of entrance and the privilege of access to and inspection of records for the purpose of determining whether or not there is compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the requirements adopted under it.

[ 2006 c 265 s 305. Formerly RCW 43.215.240.]